trunk/incubator/apertium-pl-ru.ru.dix.xml
    <pardef n="/быть__vbser">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>быть</l>
          <r>быть<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <!-- Present -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>есмь</l>
          <r>быть<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>еси</l>
          <r>быть<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>есть</l>
          <r>быть<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
       <p>
          <l>есмы</l>
          <r>быть<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>есте</l>
          <r>быть<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>суть</l>
          <r>быть<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <!-- Future -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>буду</l>
          <r>быть<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>будешь</l>
          <r>быть<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>будет</l>
          <r>быть<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>будем</l>
          <r>быть<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>будете</l>
          <r>быть<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>будут</l>
          <r>быть<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>будь</l>
          <r>быть<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>будьте</l>
          <r>быть<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>был</l>
          <r>быть<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>была</l>
          <r>быть<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>было</l>
          <r>быть<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>были</l>
          <r>быть<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>бы</l>
          <r>быть<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>б</l>
          <r>быть<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="быть"><par n="/быть__vbser"/></e>
